Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5955YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2459 Section 1. Section 670.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. For the purposes of this chapter , âemployeeâ includes a 3 person who performs services for a municipality whether or not 4 the person is compensated for the services, including a person 5 performing a housing or rental inspection for a municipality, 6 unless the services are performed only as an incident to the 7 personâs attendance at a municipality function. 8